District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.82

Rights of breastfeeding mothers.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Reasonable efforts” means any effort that would not impose an undue hardship on the operation of an employer’s business.

(2)

“Undue hardship” means any action that requires significant difficulty or expense when considered in relation to factors such as the size of the business, its financial resources, and the nature and structure of its operation.

(b)

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice to deny a woman any right provided under this section.

(c)

(1)

A woman shall have the right to breastfeed her child in any location, public or private, where she has the right to be with her child, without respect to whether the mother’s breast or any part of it is uncovered during or incidental to the breastfeeding of her child.

(2)

Notwithstanding any other provision of District of Columbia law governing indecent exposure or the definition of the private or intimate parts of a female person, including that portion of the breast that is below the top of the areola, a woman shall have the right to breastfeed in accordance with this section.

(d)

(1)

An employer shall provide reasonable daily unpaid break periods, as required by the employee, so that the employee may express breast milk for her child to maintain milk supply and comfort. If any break period, paid or unpaid, is already provided to the employee by the employer, the break period required shall run concurrently with the break periods already provided. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an employer shall not be required to provide break periods if it would create an undue hardship on the operations of the employer.

(2)

An employer shall make reasonable efforts to provide a sanitary room or other location in close proximity to the work area, other than a bathroom or toilet stall, where an employee can express her breast milk in privacy and security. The location may include a childcare facility in close proximity to the employee’s work location.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, § 282
as added Dec. 11, 2007, D.C. Law 17-58, § 2(b), 54 DCR 10714

History